District of Columbia statutes.
6-1404

Intent.

The Construction Codes shall be construed to secure their expressed intent, which is to ensure public safety, health, and welfare by building construction, through structured strength, energy and water conservation, accessibility to persons with disabilities, adequate egress facilities, sanitary equipment, light, ventilation, and fire safety; and, in general, to secure safety to life and property from all hazards incident to the design, erection, repair, removal, demolition, or use and occupancy of buildings, structures, or premises.

Mar. 21, 1987, D.C. Law 6-216, § 5, 34 DCR 1072
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 22, 53 DCR 6198
1981 Ed., § 5-1304.
D.C. Law 16-305 substituted “persons with disabilities” for “the physically handicapped”.
Establishment of Building Code Advisory Committee: See Mayor’s Order 89-257, November 7, 1989.